Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1498.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; state treasurer; Paradise Valley; law enforcement training center The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute to the Paradise Valley police department to construct a law enforcement training center that includes classrooms and facilities for firearm training and physical training.